Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2296.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3 of the act of November 26, 1978 (P.L.1375, No.325), known as the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Wetland." An area that is inundated or saturated by surface water or groundwater at a frequency and duration sufficient to 1234567891011121314151617181920 support, and that under normal circumstances does support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions, including swamps, marshes, bogs and similar areas.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 10.1. Siting of wetland replacement.(a) Whenever there is construction of replacement wetland resources to compensate for unavoidable wetland impacts as a result of permitting actions or as a measure to mitigate the effects of violations, the wetland replacement actions shall adhere to the following siting requirements:(1) Wetland replacement shall occur, where possible, immediately adjacent to the wetland affected by the obstruction or encroachment.(2) If the location of the wetland replacement site in accordance with paragraph (1) is not practicable or feasible, every effort shall be made to locate the wetland replacement site along or adjacent to the watercourse that receives benefit from the impacted wetland system.(3) If the location of the wetland replacement site in accordance with paragraph (2) is not practicable or feasible, the site shall be located within the watershed of that watercourse.(4) If a suitable site cannot be found to meet the criteria under paragraphs (1), (2) and (3), the department shall consider locating the replacement site adjacent to the next higher order stream or watercourse in the watershed.(5) The department shall reject a wetland replacement proposal for construction in a watershed other than that where the loss has occurred unless all suitable locations 20260HB2296PN3009 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 have been exhausted.(6) If the wetland impact occurs within a designated coastal zone management area, the wetland replacement shall be undertaken in that coastal zone management area.(b) If the wetland replacement occurs anywhere other than immediately adjacent to the wetland affected by the obstruction or encroachment, the department shall require documentation of why it was not practicable or feasible to locate the wetland replacement site adjacent to the impacted wetland.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2296PN3009 - 3 - 12345678910